Massachusetts, session 194th, H392.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 68 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following new section:-
Section 36. A licensed funeral establishment, as defined in regulations of the board of
registration in embalming and funeral directing, shall be prohibited from concurrently operating
an organization which is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code of the United States.
of 1